Hawaii statutes.
[§414-146] Quorum and voting requirements
for voting groups. (a) Shares entitled to vote as a separate voting group
may take action on a matter at a meeting only if a quorum of those shares
exists with respect to that matter. Unless the articles of incorporation or
this chapter provide otherwise, a majority of the votes entitled to be cast on
the matter by the voting group constitutes a quorum of that voting group for
action on that matter.

(b) Once a share is represented for any
purpose at a meeting, it is deemed present for quorum purposes for the
remainder of the meeting and for any adjournment of that meeting unless a new
record date is or must be set for that adjourned meeting.

(c) If a quorum exists, action on a matter
(other than the election of directors) by a voting group is approved if the
votes cast within the voting group favoring the action exceed the votes cast
opposing the action, unless the articles of incorporation or this chapter
require a greater number of affirmative votes.

(d) An amendment of articles of incorporation
adding, changing, or deleting a quorum or voting requirement for a voting group
greater than specified in subsection (a) or (c) is governed by section 414-148.

(e) The election of directors is governed by
section 414‑149. [L 2000, c 244, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next